Utah statutes.
53-1-110.   Compilation of highway, traffic, and driver licensing laws -- Printing and distribution -- Fees.

(1) (a)  The commissioner shall compile an edition of the general highway, traffic, and driver licensing laws of the state as soon as practicable after each regular session of the Legislature.

(b)  The edition shall include laws  enacted or amended by the most recent session of the Legislature.

(2) (a)  The Division of Finance shall print a sufficient quantity of the compiled highway, traffic, and driver licensing laws  to distribute copies to all state, county, and local enforcement agencies, courts, legislators, and other agencies as necessary.

(b)  A fee may be assessed for each copy of the compilation issued by the Division of Finance. The fee shall be established by the Division of Finance in accordance with Section  63J-1-504.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

